California, session 20252026, AB2639.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1061 is added to the Water Code, to read:1061. (a) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall conduct an assessment, on or before July 1, 2027, evaluating the efficacy of the Merced County Flood Control District.(b) The results of the final assessment shall be reported, in writing, to the Legislature and the Governor on or before July 1, 2027. The final assessment shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(1) Comparing the Merced County Flood Control District to flood control districts in other regions of the state.(2) Policy recommendations on how the Merced County Flood Control District could be modernized to meet the needs of the County of Merced.(c) The report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 5.1 is added to the Merced County Flood Control District Act (Chapter 1311 of the Statutes of 1982), to read:SEC. 5.1.The district shall coordinate its flood control planning and response operations with other local agencies located completely or partially in the County of Merced, including, but not limited to, cities and districts with responsibilities for surface water management or flood control.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.